District of Columbia statutes.
9-1107.02

Authority of Council to enact acts adopting Compact amendments.

The Council of the District of Columbia shall have authority to enact any act adopting on behalf of the District of Columbia amendments to the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Regulation Compact, but in no case shall any such amendment become effective until after it has been approved by Congress.

History

June 4, 1976, 90 Stat. 675, Pub. L. 94-306, § 4

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2432.
1973 Ed., § 1-1431-1.